Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1415
Examinations; requirements.

When the applicant has satisfied the department that he or she either has completed a full course of instruction in an accredited school of mortuary science or has completed all but the final semester of such course, the applicant shall be eligible to take the national standardized examination. The applicant shall pass such examination before beginning his or her twelve-month apprenticeship or the final six months thereof. When the applicant has satisfied the department that he or she has the qualifications specified in section 38-1416, he or she shall be eligible to take the state jurisprudence and vital statistic forms examination. A grade of seventy-five or above on each part of the licensure examination shall be a passing grade.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 94, p. 480;

C.S.1929, § 71-1303;

Laws 1931, c. 123, § 1, p. 356;

Laws 1937, c. 155, § 2, p. 613;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-1303;

R.S.1943, § 71-196;

Laws 1955, c. 271, § 2, p. 853;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-196;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1303;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 551.